en: Ground dried fenugreek leaves
es: Hojas de fenogreco secas molidas
fr: Feuilles de fenugrec séchées moulues, Kasuri Methi
hr: Samljeveno suho lišće piskavice
nl: Gemalen gedroogde fenegriek

en: Fenugreek seeds
de: Bockshornkleesamen
es: Semillas de fenogreco
fr: Graines de fenugrec
hr: Sjeme piskavice
nl: Fenegriekzaden
pl: Nasiona kozieradki

en: Whole fenugreek seeds
de: Ganze Bockshornkleesamen
es: Semillas de fenogreco enteras, Fenogreco en grano
fr: Graines de fenugrec entiers
hr: Cijele sjemenke piskavice
nl: Hele fenegriekzaden
pl: Nasiona kozieradki w całości

en: Ground fenugreek seeds
de: Gemahlene Bockshornkleesamen
es: Semillas de fenogreco molidas, Semillas de fenogreco en polvo, Fenogreco molido
fr: Graines de fenugrec en poudre
hr: Mljevene sjemenke piskavice
nl: Fenegriekzaadpoeder
pl: Nasiona kozieradki mielone

en: Dried Daylily, Dried Daylily buds
fr: Hémérocalle séchée, Fleurs d'hémérocalle séchées

en: Dried lily buds
fr: Lys séchés, Fleurs de lys séchées

en: Hemp seeds
hr: Sjemenke konoplje
lt: Kanapių sėklos
nl: Hennepzaden
pl: Nasiona konopi

en: Ginger
bg: Джинджифил
da: Ingefær
de: Ingwer
es: Jengibre
fi: inkivääri
fr: Gingembre
hr: Đumbir
it: Zenzero
ja: ショウガ, しょうが, 生姜, ジンジャー
la: Zingiber officinale
lt: Imbieras
nl: Gember
pl: Imbir
sv: Ingefära

en: Crystallized ginger, Candied ginger, Sugar-coated dried ginger rhizomes
de: kandierter Ingwer
es: Jengibre confitado
fi: sokeroitu inkivääri
fr: Gingembre confit
hr: Kristalizirani đumbir
it: Zenzero cristallizzato, Zenzero zuccherato, Zenzero ricoperto di zucchero
lt: Cukruotas imbieras
nl: Geconfijte gembers

en: Ginger powder, Dried ginger powder
bg: Джинджифил на прах
de: Ingwerpulver, gemahlener Ingwer
es: Jengibre molido, Jengibre seco en polvo
fi: Inkiväärijauhe
fr: Gingembre en poudre, Gingembre moulu, Gingembre sec en poudre
hr: Đumbir u prahu
lt: Maltas imbieras, Imbiero milteliai
nl: Gemberpoeder, Djahé

en: Fresh ginger rhizomes
es: Rizomas de jengibre frescos
fr: Rhizomes de gingembre frais, Racines de gingembre
hr: Svježeg rizoma đumbira
lt: Švieži imbiero šakniastiebiai
nl: Verse gemberwortels

en: Gari, Pickled ginger, Ginger pickles
de: Gari, Eingelegter Ingwer
es: Jengibre encurtido, Gari
fr: Gari
hr: Gari
ja: ガリ
lt: Marinuotas imbieras
ru: Имбирь маринованный, маринованный имбирь

en: Lyophilized ginger, Freeze-dried ginger
de: Gefriergetrockneter Ingwer
es: Jengibre liofilizado
fr: Gingembre lyophilisée
hr: Liofilizirani đumbir
lt: Šalčiu džiovintas imbieras
nl: Gevriesdroogde gember

en: Galangal
fr: Petit Galanga

en: Lesser Galangal powder, Dried Lesser Galangal powder
fr: Petit Galanga en poudre, Petit Galanga moulu, Gingembre séché en poudre

en: Nutmeg tree products
de: Muskatprodukte, Muskatnussbaumprodukte
es: Productos del árbol de la nuez moscada
fr: Produits de le muscadier
hr: Proizvodi od drveta muškatnog oraščića
la: Myristica fragrans
lt: Muskato riešuto medžio produktai
nl: Muscaatboom

en: Mace
de: Muskatblüte
es: Macis
fr: Macis
hr: Topuz
ja: メース
nl: Foelie

en: Nutmeg, Nutmeg seeds
bg: Индийско орехче
de: Muskatnuss
es: Nuez moscada
fi: Muskottipähkinä
fr: Noix de muscade
hr: Muškatni oraščić
ja: ナツメグ
lt: Muskato riešutai
nl: Nootmuskaat

en: Ground nutmeg, Ground nutmeg seeds
de: Muskat gemahlen, gemahlene Muskatnüsse
es: Nuez moscada molida, Nuez moscada en polvo
fr: Noix de muscade en poudre
hr: Mljeveni muškatni oraščić
lt: Maltas muskatas
nl: Nootmuscaatpoeder

en: Whole nutmeg, Whole nutmeg seeds
de: Muskat ganz, ganze Muskatnüsse
es: Nuez moscada entera
fr: Noix de muscade entières
hr: Cijeli muškatni oraščić
nl: Hele nootmuskaatnoten